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DI−392 −DIAGNOSTICS ABS&HYDRAULICBRAKEBOOSTERPOWER
SUPPLY SYSTEM

LANDCRUISER(W/G) (RM6 16E)

DTC Always ON Malfunction in ECU

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

Always ON

Eitherof the following ( 1) through(3) isdetected:
(1)TheECUconnectorsareOFFfromtheECU.
(2)There isamalfunction in theECUinternal circuit.
(3)Thevoltageof terminal IG 1 ismore than 18.5V.

SBattery
S IC regulator
SPowersourcecircuit
SABSECU

HINT:
There isacase thathand −held testercannotbeusedwhenECUisabnormal.
Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the ECU, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and prohibits ABS control.

WIRING DIAGRAM

DI29E−07
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check that the ECU connectors are securely connected to the ECU.

NO Connect the connector to the ECU.

YES

2 Is DTC output?

Check DTC on page DI−312.

YES Repair circuit indicated by the output code .

NO

3 Is normal code displayed?

YES Check solenoid relay. Check for short circuit in
harness and connector between solenoid relay
and check connector (See page IN−24).

NO

4 Does ABS warning light go off?

YES Check for open or short circuit in harness and
connector between ECU−IG fuse and ECU (See
page IN−24).

NO
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5 Check battery voltage.

CHECK:
(a) Start the engine.
(b) Check the battery voltage.
OK:

Voltage: 10 − 16 V

NG Check and repair the charging system.

OK

6 Check operation of the ABS warning light.

IN CASE OF USING HAND−HELD TESTER:
PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand−held tester main switch ON.
(c) Select the ACTIVE TEST mode on the hand−held tester.
CHECK:
Check that ”ON” and ”OFF” of the ABS warning light can be shown on the combination meter by the hand−
held tester.
IN CASE OF NOT USING HAND−HELD TESTER:
PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch OFF.
(b) Disconnect the connector from the ABS ECU.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Check the ABS warning light condition when pushing in and pulling out the short pin from the check connec-
tor.
OK:

When the short pin is pulled out: ABS warning light goes off
When the short pin is pushed in: ABS warning light goes on

OK Check and replace ABS ECU.

NG

Check for short circuit in harness and connector between combination meter and ABS ECU, com-
bination meter and check connector (See page IN−24).
Check ABS solenoid relay circuit (See page DI−335).


